Wyoming, session 2025, HB0304.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 36-2-107(b) by creating a new
paragraph (viii) is amended to read:

36-2-107. Rules and regulations; general penalty for
violations; enforcement.

(b) Any person who knowingly violates any provision
of this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be
fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00),
HB0304

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0701
imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both. In
addition, any person found guilty under this section may be
ordered to pay restitution to the board for actual
pecuniary damage resulting from the illegal actions of the
person. Restitution may be excused if a court finds that
the defendant has no ability to pay. In determining the
amount of restitution under this subsection, the court
shall consider, and include as a special finding, the
reasonably foreseeable actual pecuniary damage that has or
will result from the illegal activities of the defendant.
Any restitution received under this subsection shall be
deposited into an account designated by the board for use
to restore the rights and property of the board. The acts
prohibited under this subsection are:

(viii) Trespassing on leased state lands
classified and used as cultivated cropland for the purpose
of hunting or fishing without authorization from the board.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0304